District of Columbia statutes.
2-1217.34i

Limited liability.

(a)

The Bonds shall be special obligations of the District. The Bonds shall be without recourse to the District. The Bonds shall not be general obligations of the District, shall not be a pledge of, or involve, the faith and credit or the taxing power of the District (other than the Available Tax Increment and any other taxes or fees allocated to the Howard Theatre Redevelopment Project Fund), shall not constitute a debt of the District, and shall not constitute lending of the public credit for private undertakings as prohibited in § 1-206.02(a)(2).

(b)

The Bonds shall not give rise to any pecuniary liability of the District and the District shall have no obligation with respect to the purchase of the Bonds.

(c)

No person, including, but not limited to any Bond owner, shall have any claims against the District or any of its elected or appointed officials, officers, employees, or agents for monetary damages suffered as a result of the failure of the District to perform any covenant, undertaking, or obligation under this subpart [§§ 2-1217.34a to 2-1217.34n], the Bonds, the Financing Documents, or the Closing Documents, or as a result of the incorrectness of any representation in or omission from the Financing Documents or the Closing Documents, unless the District or its elected or appointed officials, officers, employees, or agents have acted in a willful and fraudulent manner.

Dec. 7, 2010, D.C. Law 18-275, § 10, 57 DCR 9873
This section is referenced in § 2-1217.34j.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 10 of Howard Theatre Redevelopment project Great Streets Initiative Tax Increment Financing Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-516, August 3, 2010, 57 DCR 7971).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 10 of Howard Theatre Redevelopment Project Great Streets Initiative Tax Increment Financing Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-573, October 19, 2010, 57 DCR 10090).